Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
General Provisions

154.47-005.
Definitions for subchapter.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Approved network” means a flexible manufacturing network approved by the cabinet in accordance with KRS 154.47-040;

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Economic Development;

“Center” means the Quicksand Wood Utilization Center located in Breathitt County, Kentucky;

“Certified tree farmer” means a person whose tree farm is certified by the Kentucky Tree Farm Committee and approved by the American Forest Foundation;

“Flexible manufacturing network” or “network” means an affiliation of secondary wood products businesses as provided by KRS 154.47-040;

“Forest steward” means a person whose forest property is certified as a stewardship forest and approved by the Division of Forestry of the Department for Natural Resources;

“Procurement area” means an area specified by the applicant in a radius of miles from the applicant’s site of operations from which the applicant acquires raw wood products;

“Secondary wood products industry” means businesses that compose that segment of the forest products industry that manufacture, assemble, process, or produce wood into a finished or semifinished product; however, the “secondary wood products industry” does not include primary wood products operations such as logging, sawmilling, chip milling, veneer milling, or pulp milling. Businesses that include both primary and secondary wood products operations are deemed to be within the secondary wood products industry only in regard to their secondary wood products operations; and

“Wood industry hub” or “hub” means a system in which the technical and workforce training needs of the secondary wood products industry are integrated.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 224, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2013, ch. 49, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 117, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.

154.47-010.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky finds that the forests of the Commonwealth provide abundant, renewal timber resources that historically have been underdeveloped, underutilized, and poorly managed, but which have proven to be resilient; and that, with proper planning, management, harvesting, value-added processing and manufacturing, and marketing, these resources will continue to grow in importance to the Commonwealth’s economy.

The General Assembly further finds that through proper attention and direction by the agencies of the Commonwealth and its public educational institutions working in partnership with secondary wood products businesses, the secondary wood products industry as a key industrial sector of the Commonwealth’s future economic growth and health, should prosper through the generation of new and expanding secondary wood products manufacturers by supporting improved management and harvesting practices, by developing and implementing workers’ training programs to upgrade the skills of Kentuckians employed in the wood products processing and manufacturing industry, by assisting the private sector to adapt existing manufacturing systems to new or improved technologies and world class management practices for the purposes of increasing product quality and productivity of Kentucky’s wood products manufacturers and processors and enhancing the global competitiveness of Kentucky secondary wood products industries.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 224, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.